District of Columbia statutes.
31-5329

Injunction.

No application or petition for injunction against any domestic, foreign or alien society, or lodge thereof, shall be recognized in any court of the District unless made by the Corporation Counsel upon request of the Commissioner.

History

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1230, 45 DCR 1172

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1259.